liblouis-back-translation-tables/en-us-g3-abk.ctb
word manure 134-1345-136-1235-15
word manorial 134-1345-135-1235-24-1-123
word manuring 134-1345-136-1235-346
word manure's 134-1345-136-1235-15-3-234
word manures 134-1345-136-1235-15-234
word mannerism 134-1345-1345-12456-24-234-134
word mannerism's 134-1345-1345-12456-24-234-134-3-234
word mannerisms 134-1345-1345-12456-24-234-134-234
word mannered 134-1345-1345-12456-1246
word manured 134-1345-136-1235-1246
word mane's 134-1345-15-3-234
word manes 134-1345-15-234
word mania's 134-1345-24-1-3-234
word manias 134-1345-24-1-234
word manna's 134-1345-1345-1-3-234
word manner's 134-1345-1345-12456-3-234
word manners 134-1345-1345-12456-234
word manor's 134-1345-135-1235-3-234
word manors 134-1345-135-1235-234
word man's 134-1345-3-234
word mans 134-1345-234
word manse 134-1345-234-15
word many's 134-1345-13456-3-234
word manservant 134-1345-234-12456-1236-1-1345-2345
word manservant's 134-1345-234-12456-1236-1-1345-2345-3-234
word manuscript 134-1345-136-234-14-1235-24-1234-2345
word manuscript's 134-1345-136-234-14-1235-24-1234-2345-3-234
word manuscripts 134-1345-136-234-14-1235-24-1234-2345-234
word manslaughter 134-1345-234-123-1-136-126-2345-12456
word manslaughter's 134-1345-234-123-1-136-126-2345-12456-3-234
word manse's 134-1345-234-15-3-234
word manses 134-1345-234-15-234
word mansard 134-1345-234-345-145
word mansard's 134-1345-234-345-145-3-234
word mansards 134-1345-234-345-145-234
word manatee 134-1345-1-2345-15-15
word maned 134-1345-1246
word manned 134-1345-1345-1246
word manta 134-1345-2345-1
word mandible 134-1345-145-24-3456
word mandibular 134-1345-145-24-12-136-123-345
word mandible's 134-1345-145-24-3456-3-234
word mandibles 134-1345-145-24-3456-234
word mandala 134-1345-145-1-123-1
word mantel 134-1345-2345-15-123
word mantilla 134-1345-2345-24-123-123-1
word mantle 134-1345-2345-123-15
word mandolin 134-1345-145-135-123-35
word mantling 134-1345-2345-123-346
word mandolin's 134-1345-145-135-123-35-3-234
word mandolins 134-1345-145-135-123-35-234
word mantelpiece 134-1345-2345-15-123-1234-24-15-14-15
word mantelpiece's 134-1345-2345-15-123-1234-24-15-14-15-3-234
word mantelpieces 134-1345-2345-15-123-1234-24-15-14-15-234
word mandala's 134-1345-145-1-123-1-3-234
word mandalas 134-1345-145-1-123-1-234
word mantel's 134-1345-2345-15-123-3-234
word mantels 134-1345-2345-15-123-234
word mantilla's 134-1345-2345-24-123-123-1-3-234
word mantillas 134-1345-2345-24-123-123-1-234
word mantle's 134-1345-2345-123-15-3-234
word mantles 134-1345-2345-123-15-234
word mantled 134-1345-2345-123-1246
word mantelshelf 134-1345-2345-15-123-146-15-123-124
word mantelshelves 134-1345-2345-15-123-146-15-123-1236-15-234
word mandamus 134-1345-145-1-134-136-234
word mandamus's 134-1345-145-1-134-136-234-3-234
word mandamuses 134-1345-145-1-134-136-234-15-234
word mantra 134-1345-2345-1235-1
word mandrake 134-1345-145-1235-1-13-15
word mandrake's 134-1345-145-1235-1-13-15-3-234
word mandrakes 134-1345-145-1235-1-13-15-234
word mandrel 134-1345-145-1235-15-123
word mandrill 134-1345-145-1235-24-123-123
word mandrel's 134-1345-145-1235-15-123-3-234
word mandrels 134-1345-145-1235-15-123-234
word mandrill's 134-1345-145-1235-24-123-123-3-234
word mandrills 134-1345-145-1235-24-123-123-234
word mandarin 134-1345-145-345-35
word mandarin's 134-1345-145-345-35-3-234
word mandarins 134-1345-145-345-35-234
word mantra's 134-1345-2345-1235-1-3-234
word mantras 134-1345-2345-1235-1-234
word manatee's 134-1345-1-2345-15-15-3-234
word manatees 134-1345-1-2345-15-15-234
word manta's 134-1345-2345-1-3-234
word mantas 134-1345-2345-1-234
word mantis 134-1345-2345-24-234
word mantis's 134-1345-2345-24-234-3-234
word mantissa 134-1345-2345-24-234-234-1
word mantises 134-1345-2345-24-234-15-234
word mantissa's 134-1345-2345-24-234-234-1-3-234
word mantissas 134-1345-2345-24-234-234-1-234
word mandate 134-1345-145-1-2345-15
word mandating 134-1345-145-1-2345-346
word mandatory 134-1345-145-1-2345-135-1235-13456
word mandate's 134-1345-145-1-2345-15-3-234
word mandates 134-1345-145-1-2345-15-234
word mandated 134-1345-145-1-2345-1246
word mannish 134-1345-1345-24-146
word mannishly 134-1345-1345-24-146-123-13456
word mansion 134-1345-46-1345
word mannishness 134-1345-1345-24-146-56-234
word mannishness's 134-1345-1345-24-146-56-234-3-234
word mansion's 134-1345-46-1345-3-234
word mansions 134-1345-46-1345-234
word maneuver 134-1345-15-136-1236-12456
word maneuverable 134-1345-15-136-1236-12456-1-3456
word maneuverability 134-1345-15-136-1236-12456-1-12-24-123-56-13456
word maneuverability's 134-1345-15-136-1236-12456-1-12-24-123-56-13456-3-234
word maneuvering 134-1345-15-136-1236-12456-346
word maneuverings 134-1345-15-136-1236-12456-346-234
word maneuvered 134-1345-15-136-1236-12456-1246
word maneuver's 134-1345-15-136-1236-12456-3-234
word maneuvers 134-1345-15-136-1236-12456-234
word manege 134-1345-15-1245-15
word manque 134-1345-12345-136-15
word manege's 134-1345-15-1245-15-3-234
word manila 134-1345-24-123-1
word manila's 134-1345-24-123-1-3-234
word manana 134-1345-1-1345-1
word manana's 134-1345-1-1345-1-3-234
word mantes 134-1345-2345-15-234
word nor 1345-1235
word north 1345-1235-1456
word norther 1345-1235-2346-1235
word northbound 1345-1235-1456-12-46-145
word northerly 1345-1235-2346-1235-123-13456
word northerlies 1345-1235-2346-1235-123-24-15-234
word northerly's 1345-1235-2346-1235-123-13456-3-234
word northern 1345-1235-2346-1235-1345
word northerner 1345-1235-2346-1235-1345-12456
word northernmost 1345-1235-2346-1235-1345-134-135-34
word northerner's 1345-1235-2346-1235-1345-12456-3-234
word northerners 1345-1235-2346-1235-1345-12456-234
word norther's 1345-1235-2346-1235-3-234
word northers 1345-1235-2346-1235-234
word north's 1345-1235-1456-3-234
word northeast 1345-1235-1456-15-1-34
word northeaster 1345-1235-1456-15-1-34-12456
word northeasterly 1345-1235-1456-15-1-34-12456-123-13456
word northeastern 1345-1235-1456-15-1-34-12456-1345
word northeaster's 1345-1235-1456-15-1-34-12456-3-234
word northeasters 1345-1235-1456-15-1-34-12456-234
word northeast's 1345-1235-1456-15-1-34-3-234
word northeastward 1345-1235-1456-15-1-34-2456-345-145
word northeastwards 1345-1235-1456-15-1-34-2456-345-145-234
word northwest 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34
word northwester 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-12456
word northwesterly 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-12456-123-13456
word northwestern 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-12456-1345
word northwester's 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-12456-3-234
word northwesters 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-12456-234
word northwest's 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-3-234
word northwestward 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-2456-345-145
word northwestwards 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-2456-345-145-234
word northward 1345-1235-1456-2456-345-145
word northwards 1345-1235-1456-2456-345-145-234
word norm 1345-1235-134
word normal 1345-1235-134-1-123
word normally 1345-1235-134-6-13456
word normalcy 1345-1235-134-1-123-14-13456
word normal's 1345-1235-134-1-123-3-234
word normalcy's 1345-1235-134-1-123-14-13456-3-234
word normality 1345-1235-134-1-123-56-13456
word normality's 1345-1235-134-1-123-56-13456-3-234
word norm's 1345-1235-134-3-234
word norms 1345-1235-134-234
word normative 1345-1235-134-1-2345-24-1236-15
word nor'easter 1345-1235-3-15-1-34-12456
word normalize 1345-1235-134-1-123-24-1356-15
word normalizing 1345-1235-134-1-123-24-1356-346
word normalizes 1345-1235-134-1-123-24-1356-15-234
word normalized 1345-1235-134-1-123-24-1356-1246
word normalization 1345-1235-134-1-123-24-1356-6-1345
word normalization's 1345-1235-134-1-123-24-1356-6-1345-3-234
word north 1345-1235-1456
word norther 1345-1235-1456-12456
word northbound 1345-1235-1456-12-46-145
word northerly 1345-1235-1456-12456-123-13456
word northerlies 1345-1235-1456-12456-123-24-15-234
word northerly's 1345-1235-1456-12456-123-13456-3-234
word northern 1345-1235-1456-12456-1345
word northerner 1345-1235-1456-12456-1345-12456
word northernmost 1345-1235-1456-12456-1345-134-135-34
word northerner's 1345-1235-1456-12456-1345-12456-3-234
word northerners 1345-1235-1456-12456-1345-12456-234
word norther's 1345-1235-1456-12456-3-234
word northers 1345-1235-1456-12456-234
word north's 1345-1235-1456-3-234
word northeast 1345-1235-1456-2-34
word northeaster 1345-1235-1456-2-34-12456
word northeasterly 1345-1235-1456-2-34-12456-123-13456
word northeastern 1345-1235-1456-2-34-12456-1345
word northeaster's 1345-1235-1456-2-34-12456-3-234
word northeasters 1345-1235-1456-2-34-12456-234
word northeast's 1345-1235-1456-2-34-3-234
word northeastward 1345-1235-1456-2-34-2456-345-145
word northeastwards 1345-1235-1456-2-34-2456-345-145-234
word northwest 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34
word northwester 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-12456
word northwesterly 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-12456-123-13456
word northwestern 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-12456-1345
word northwester's 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-12456-3-234
word northwesters 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-12456-234
word northwest's 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-3-234
word northwestward 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-2456-345-145
word northwestwards 1345-1235-1456-2456-15-34-2456-345-145-234
word northward 1345-1235-1456-2456-345-145
word northwards 1345-1235-1456-2456-345-145-234
word note 1345-2345-15
word notebook 1345-2345-15-12-135-135-13
word notebook's 1345-2345-15-12-135-135-13-3-234
word notebooks 1345-2345-15-12-135-135-13-234
word notelet 1345-2345-15-123-15-2345
word notelets 1345-2345-15-123-15-2345-234
word notepaper 1345-2345-15-1234-1-1234-12456
word notepaper's 1345-2345-15-1234-1-1234-12456-3-234
word notepad 1345-2345-15-1234-1-145
word notepads 1345-2345-15-1234-1-145-234
word note's 1345-2345-15-3-234
word notes 1345-2345-15-234
word noted 1345-2345-15-145
word noteworthy 1345-2345-15-2456-135-1235-1456-13456
word noteworthiness 1345-2345-15-2456-135-1235-1456-24-56-234
word noteworthiness's 1345-2345-15-2456-135-1235-1456-24-56-234-3-234
word new 1345-2456
word newbie 1345-2456-12-24-15
word newborn 1345-2456-12-135-1235-1345
word newborn's 1345-2456-12-135-1235-1345-3-234
word newborns 1345-2456-12-135-1235-1345-234
word newbie's 1345-2456-12-24-15-3-234
word newbies 1345-2456-12-24-15-234
word newfangled 1345-2456-124-1-1345-1245-123-1246
word newfound 1345-2456-124-46-145
word newcomer 1345-2456-14-135-134-12456
word newcomer's 1345-2456-14-135-134-12456-3-234
word newcomers 1345-2456-14-135-134-12456-234
word newly 1345-2456-123-13456
word newline 1345-2456-123-35-15
word newlines 1345-2456-123-35-15-234
word newlywed 1345-2456-123-13456-2456-1246
word newlywed's 1345-2456-123-13456-2456-1246-3-234
word newlyweds 1345-2456-123-13456-2456-1246-234
word newness 1345-2456-56-234
word newness's 1345-2456-56-234-3-234
word new's 1345-2456-3-234
word news 1345-2456-234
word newsier 1345-2456-234-24-12456
word news's 1345-2456-234-3-234
word newsy 1345-2456-234-13456
word newsboy 1345-2456-234-12-135-13456
word newsboy's 1345-2456-234-12-135-13456-3-234
word newsboys 1345-2456-234-12-135-13456-234
word newsflash 1345-2456-234-124-123-1-146
word newsflashes 1345-2456-234-124-123-1-146-15-234
word newsgirl 1345-2456-234-1245-24-1235-123
word newsgirl's 1345-2456-234-1245-24-1235-123-3-234
word newsgirls 1345-2456-234-1245-24-1235-123-234
word newsagent 1345-2456-234-1-1245-26-2345
word newsagents 1345-2456-234-1-1245-26-2345-234
word newsgroup 1345-2456-234-1245-1235-1256-1234
word newsgroup's 1345-2456-234-1245-1235-1256-1234-3-234
word newsgroups 1345-2456-234-1245-1235-1256-1234-234
word newscast 1345-2456-234-14-1-34
word newscaster 1345-2456-234-14-1-34-12456
word newscaster's 1345-2456-234-14-1-34-12456-3-234
word newscasters 1345-2456-234-14-1-34-12456-234
word newscast's 1345-2456-234-14-1-34-3-234
word newscasts 1345-2456-234-14-1-34-234
word newsletter 1345-2456-234-123-15-2345-2345-12456
word newsletter's 1345-2456-234-123-15-2345-2345-12456-3-234
word newsletters 1345-2456-234-123-15-2345-2345-12456-234
word newsman 1345-2456-234-134-1-1345
word newsmen 1345-2456-234-134-26
